Florida, session 2026, HB907.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of section
921.002, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
921.002 The Criminal Punishment Code.—The Criminal
Punishment Code shall apply to all felony offenses, except
capital felonies, committed on or after October 1, 1998.
(1) The provision of criminal penalties and of limitations
upon the application of such penalties is a matter of
predominantly substantive law and, as such, is a matter properly
addressed by the Legislature. The Legislature, in the exercise
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb907-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 907 2026
of its authority and responsibility to establish sentencing
criteria, to provide for the imposition of criminal penalties,
and to make the best use of state prisons so that violent
criminal offenders are appropriately incarcerated, has
determined that it is in the best interest of the state to
develop, implement, and revise a sentencing policy. The Criminal
Punishment Code embodies the principles that:
(e) The sentence imposed by the sentencing judge reflects
the length of actual time to be served, shortened only by the
application of incentive and meritorious gain-time as provided
by law, and may not be shortened if the defendant would
consequently serve less than the required percentage 85 percent
of his or her term of imprisonment as provided in s. 944.275(4).
The provisions of chapter 947, relating to parole, shall not
apply to persons sentenced under the Criminal Punishment Code.
Section 2. Paragraphs (e) and (f) of subsection (4) of
section 944.275, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
paragraphs (h) and (i), respectively, present paragraph (f) is
amended, and new paragraphs (e), (f), and (g) are added to that
subsection, to read:
944.275 Gain-time.—
(4)
(e) Notwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of
incentive gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the
department may grant an award of 60 to 180 additional days of
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb907-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 907 2026
vocational or workforce preparedness incentive gain-time to an
inmate who is otherwise eligible and who successfully completes
requirements for and is, or has been during the current
commitment, awarded a vocational certificate not resulting in
credit under paragraph (d), or who completes any other career or
workforce preparedness or technical education program, including
the prison entrepreneurship program. The department may also
grant an award of 30 to 90 days to an inmate who completes an
educational or rehabilitation program not resulting in credit
under paragraph (d) or this paragraph, including, but not
limited to, a drug, behavioral health, or mental health
treatment program, a life skills program, a reentry program, or
any character-based program.
(f) Notwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of
incentive gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the
department may grant up to 5 days per month of vocational or
workforce preparedness incentive gain-time for each month in
which an inmate participates in a vocational or workforce
preparedness program as designated by the department. Under no
circumstances may an inmate receive vocational or workforce
preparedness incentive gain-time under this subsection of more
than 15 percent of the sentence imposed for that inmate.
(g) Notwithstanding the monthly maximum awards of
incentive gain-time under subparagraphs (b)1., 2., and 3., the
department may grant up to three additional incentive gain-time
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb907-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 907 2026
awards of up to 60 days each to an inmate who has used his or
her time constructively and demonstrated a diligent commitment
to rehabilitation considering the availability and accessibility
of education, work assignments, workforce preparation training,
and other programming in the inmate's place, or places, of
incarceration.
(i)(f) An inmate who is subject to subparagraph (b)3. is
not eligible to earn or receive gain-time under paragraph (a),
paragraph (b), paragraph (c), or paragraph (d), paragraph (e),
paragraph (f), or paragraph (g) or any other type of gain-time
in an amount that would cause a sentence to expire, end, or
terminate, or that would result in a prisoner's release, before
prior to serving a minimum of 65 percent of the sentence imposed
for a nonviolent felony as defined in s. 948.20(1), or 85
percent of the sentence imposed for an offense other than a
nonviolent felony as defined in s. 948.20(1). For purposes of
this paragraph, credits awarded by the court for time physically
incarcerated shall be credited toward satisfaction of the
applicable minimum percentage 85 percent of the sentence
imposed. Except as provided by this section, a prisoner may not
accumulate further gain-time awards at any point when the
tentative release date is the same as that date at which the
prisoner will have served the applicable minimum percentage 85
percent of the sentence imposed. State prisoners sentenced to
100 life imprisonment shall be incarcerated for the rest of their
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb907-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 907 2026
101 natural lives, unless granted pardon or clemency.
102 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb907-00